src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pt-BR.aff
SFX n Y 1072
SFX n   0      -me             [aei]r
SFX n   0      -te             [aei]r
SFX n   0      -se             [aei]r
SFX n   0      -nos            [aei]r
SFX n   0      -vos            [aei]r
SFX n   0      -lhe            [aei]r
SFX n   0      -lhes           [aei]r
SFX n   ar       -la           ar
SFX n   ar       -las          ar
SFX n   ar       -lo           ar
SFX n   ar       -los          ar
SFX n   er       -la           er
SFX n   er       -las          er
SFX n   er       -lo           er
SFX n   er       -los          er
SFX n   or       -la           or
SFX n   or       -las          or
SFX n   or       -lo           or
SFX n   or       -los          or
SFX n   r       -a             rir
SFX n   r       -as            rir
SFX n   r       -lhe           rir
SFX n   r       -lhes          rir
SFX n   r       -me            rir
SFX n   r       -nos           rir
SFX n   r       -o             rir
SFX n   r       -os            rir
SFX n   r       -se            rir
SFX n   r       -te            rir
SFX n   r       -vos           rir
SFX n   r       a-a            rir
SFX n   r       a-as           rir
SFX n   r       a-lhe          rir
SFX n   r       a-lhes         rir
SFX n   r       a-me           rir
SFX n   r       a-nos          rir
SFX n   r       a-o            rir
SFX n   r       a-os           rir
SFX n   r       a-se           rir
SFX n   r       a-te           rir
SFX n   r       a-vos          rir
SFX n   r       am-lhe         rir
SFX n   r       am-lhes        rir
SFX n   r       am-me          rir
SFX n   r       am-na          rir
SFX n   r       am-nas         rir
SFX n   r       am-no          rir
SFX n   r       am-nos         rir
SFX n   r       am-se          rir
SFX n   r       am-te          rir
SFX n   r       am-vos         rir
SFX n   r       amo-nos        rir
SFX n   r       amo-vos        rir
SFX n   r       amos-lhe       rir
SFX n   r       amos-lhes      rir
SFX n   r       amos-te        rir
SFX n   ir       amo-nos       rir
SFX n   ir       amo-vos       rir
SFX n   ir       amos-lhe      rir
SFX n   ir       amos-lhes     rir
SFX n   ir       amos-te       rir
SFX n   r       do-a           rir
SFX n   r       do-as          rir
SFX n   r       do-lhe         rir
SFX n   r       do-lhes        rir
SFX n   r       do-me          rir
SFX n   r       do-nos         rir
SFX n   r       do-o           rir
SFX n   r       do-os          rir
SFX n   r       do-se          rir
SFX n   r       do-te          rir
SFX n   r       do-vos         rir
SFX n   r       em-lhe         rir
SFX n   r       em-lhes        rir
SFX n   r       em-me          rir
SFX n   r       em-na          rir
SFX n   r       em-nas         rir
SFX n   r       em-no          rir
SFX n   r       em-nos         rir
SFX n   r       em-se          rir
SFX n   r       em-te          rir
SFX n   r       em-vos         rir
SFX n   r       mo-nos         rir
SFX n   r       mo-vos         rir
SFX n   r       mos-lhe        rir
SFX n   r       mos-lhes       rir
SFX n   r       mos-te         rir
SFX n   r       ndo-a          rir
SFX n   r       ndo-as         rir
SFX n   r       ndo-lhe        rir
SFX n   r       ndo-lhes       rir
SFX n   r       ndo-me         rir
SFX n   r       ndo-nos        rir
SFX n   r       ndo-o          rir
SFX n   r       ndo-os         rir
SFX n   r       ndo-se         rir
SFX n   r       ndo-te         rir
SFX n   r       ndo-vos        rir
SFX n   r       o-a            rir
SFX n   r       o-as           rir
SFX n   r       o-lhe          rir
SFX n   r       o-lhes         rir
SFX n   r       o-me           rir
SFX n   r       o-nos          rir
SFX n   r       o-o            rir
SFX n   r       o-os           rir
SFX n   r       o-te           rir
SFX n   r       o-vos          rir
SFX n   0       a-a            rir
SFX n   0       a-as           rir
SFX n   0       a-lhe          rir
SFX n   0       a-lhes         rir
SFX n   0       a-me           rir
SFX n   0       a-nos          rir
SFX n   0       a-o            rir
SFX n   0       a-os           rir
SFX n   0       a-se           rir
SFX n   0       a-te           rir
SFX n   0       a-vos          rir
SFX n   0       -la-           rir
SFX n   0       -las-          rir
SFX n   0       -lhe-          rir
SFX n   0       -lhes-         rir
SFX n   0       -lo-           rir
SFX n   0       -los-          rir
SFX n   0       -me-           rir
SFX n   0       -nos-          rir
SFX n   0       -se-           rir
SFX n   0       -te-           rir
SFX n   0       -vos-          rir
SFX n   0       am-lhe         rir
SFX n   0       am-lhes        rir
SFX n   0       am-me          rir
SFX n   0       am-na          rir
SFX n   0       am-nas         rir
SFX n   0       am-no          rir
SFX n   0       am-nos         rir
SFX n   0       am-se          rir
SFX n   0       am-te          rir
SFX n   0       am-vos         rir
SFX n   0       -lhe- o        rir
SFX n   0       -lhes- o       rir
SFX n   0       -me- o         rir
SFX n   0       -na- o         rir
SFX n   0       -nas- o        rir
SFX n   0       -no- o         rir
SFX n   0       -nos- o        rir
SFX n   0       -se- o         rir
SFX n   0       -te- o         rir
SFX n   0       -vos- o        rir
SFX n   0       -lhe- s        rir
SFX n   0       -lhes- s       rir
SFX n   0       -me- s         rir
SFX n   0       -nos- s        rir
SFX n   0       -se- s         rir
SFX n   0       -te- s         rir
SFX n   0       -vos- s        rir
SFX n   0       -lhe-ei        rir
SFX n   0       -lhes-ei       rir
SFX n   0       -me-ei         rir
SFX n   0       -nos-ei        rir
SFX n   0       -se-ei         rir
SFX n   0       -te-ei         rir
SFX n   0       -vos-ei        rir
SFX n   0       em-lhe         rir
SFX n   0       em-lhes        rir
SFX n   0       em-me          rir
SFX n   0       em-na          rir
SFX n   0       em-nas         rir
SFX n   0       em-no          rir
SFX n   0       em-nos         rir
SFX n   0       em-se          rir
SFX n   0       em-te          rir
SFX n   0       em-vos         rir
SFX n   0       -la-emos       rir
SFX n   0       -las-emos      rir
SFX n   0       -lhe-emos      rir
SFX n   0       -lhes-emos     rir
SFX n   0       -lo-emos       rir
SFX n   0       -los-emos      rir
SFX n   0       -nos-emos      rir
SFX n   0       -te-emos       rir
SFX n   0       -vos-emos      rir
SFX n   0       -lhe-ia        rir
SFX n   0       -lhes-ia       rir
SFX n   0       -me-ia         rir
SFX n   0       -nos-ia        rir
SFX n   0       -se-ia         rir
SFX n   0       -te-ia         rir
SFX n   0       -vos-ia        rir
SFX n   0       -lhe-iam       rir
SFX n   0       -lhes-iam      rir
SFX n   0       -me-iam        rir
SFX n   0       -nos-iam       rir
SFX n   0       -se-iam        rir
SFX n   0       -te-iam        rir
SFX n   0       -vos-iam       rir
SFX n   0        amo-nos       rir
SFX n   0        amo-vos       rir
SFX n   0        amos-lhe      rir
SFX n   0        amos-lhes     rir
SFX n   0        amos-te       rir
SFX n   0       mo-nos         rir
SFX n   0       mo-vos         rir
SFX n   0       mos-lhe        rir
SFX n   0       mos-lhes       rir
SFX n   0       mos-te         rir
SFX n   r       sse-a          rir
SFX n   r       sse-as         rir
SFX n   r       sse-lhe        rir
SFX n   r       sse-lhes       rir
SFX n   r       sse-me         rir
SFX n   r       sse-nos        rir
SFX n   r       sse-o          rir
SFX n   r       sse-os         rir
SFX n   r       sse-se         rir
SFX n   r       sse-te         rir
SFX n   r       sse-vos        rir
SFX n   r       ssem-lhe       rir
SFX n   r       ssem-lhes      rir
SFX n   r       ssem-me        rir
SFX n   r       ssem-na        rir
SFX n   r       ssem-nas       rir
SFX n   r       ssem-no        rir
SFX n   r       ssem-nos       rir
SFX n   r       ssem-te        rir
SFX n   r       ssem-vos       rir
SFX n   r       ste-a          rir
SFX n   r       ste-as         rir
SFX n   r       ste-lhe        rir
SFX n   r       ste-lhes       rir
SFX n   r       ste-me         rir
SFX n   r       ste-nos        rir
SFX n   r       ste-o          rir
SFX n   r       ste-os         rir
SFX n   r       ste-se         rir
SFX n   r       ste-te         rir
SFX n   r       ste-vos        rir
SFX n   r       u-a            rir
SFX n   r       u-as           rir
SFX n   r       u-lhe          rir
SFX n   r       u-lhes         rir
SFX n   r       u-me           rir
SFX n   r       u-nos          rir
SFX n   r       u-o            rir
SFX n   r       u-os           rir
SFX n   r       u-se           rir
SFX n   r       u-te           rir
SFX n   r       u-vos          rir
SFX n   ir      e-a            [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      e-as           [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      e-lhe          [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      e-lhes         [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      e-me           [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      e-nos          [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      e-o            [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      e-os           [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      e-se           [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      e-te           [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      e-vos          [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      em-lhe         [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      em-lhes        [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      em-me          [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      em-na          [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      em-nas         [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      em-no          [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      em-nos         [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      em-se          [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      em-te          [dl]ir
SFX n   ir      em-vos         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       -la            [dl]ir
SFX n   r       -las           [dl]ir
SFX n   r       -lhe           [dl]ir
SFX n   r       -lhes          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       -me            [dl]ir
SFX n   r       -nos           [dl]ir
SFX n   r       -lo            [dl]ir
SFX n   r       -los           [dl]ir
SFX n   r       -se            [dl]ir
SFX n   r       -te            [dl]ir
SFX n   r       -vos           [dl]ir
SFX n   r       a-a            [dl]ir
SFX n   r       a-as           [dl]ir
SFX n   r       a-lhe          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       a-lhes         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       a-me           [dl]ir
SFX n   r       a-nos          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       a-o            [dl]ir
SFX n   r       a-os           [dl]ir
SFX n   r       a-se           [dl]ir
SFX n   r       a-te           [dl]ir
SFX n   r       a-vos          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       am-lhe         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       am-lhes        [dl]ir
SFX n   r       am-me          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       am-na          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       am-nas         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       am-no          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       am-nos         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       am-se          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       am-te          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       am-vos         [dl]ir
SFX n   ir       amo-nos       [dl]ir
SFX n   ir       amo-vos       [dl]ir
SFX n   ir       amos-lhe      [dl]ir
SFX n   ir       amos-lhes     [dl]ir
SFX n   ir       amos-te       [dl]ir
SFX n   r       do-a           [dl]ir
SFX n   r       do-as          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       do-lhe         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       do-lhes        [dl]ir
SFX n   r       do-me          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       do-nos         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       do-o           [dl]ir
SFX n   r       do-os          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       do-se          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       do-te          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       do-vos         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       mo-nos         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       mo-vos         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       mos-lhe        [dl]ir
SFX n   r       mos-lhes       [dl]ir
SFX n   r       mos-te         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       ndo-a          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       ndo-as         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       ndo-lhe        [dl]ir
SFX n   r       ndo-lhes       [dl]ir
SFX n   r       ndo-me         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       ndo-nos        [dl]ir
SFX n   r       ndo-o          [dl]ir
SFX n   r       ndo-os         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       ndo-se         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       ndo-te         [dl]ir
SFX n   r       ndo-vos        [dl]ir
